Arkansas, session 2025, HB1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-301(3)(A)(i), concerning the services
subject to the tax levied under the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, is
amended to read as follows:
(A)(i) Service of furnishing rooms, suites, condominiums,
townhouses, rental houses, or other accommodations by hotels, apartment
hotels, lodging houses, tourist camps, tourist courts, property management
companies, accommodations intermediaries, or any other provider of
accommodations to transient guests other than a tourist camp or a tourist
court.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-316(a)(9) and (10), concerning
*JLL117*
02-13-2025 12:24:06 JLL117

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1388
services subject to sales tax, are repealed.
(9) Boat storage and docking fees;
(10) The furnishing of camping spaces or trailer spaces at
public or privately owned campgrounds, except for federal campgrounds, on
less than a month-to-month basis;

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this
act.

/s/Vaught

























02-13-2025 12:24:06 JLL117